Utah statutes.
34A-2-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Business entity" means:

(a)  a sole proprietorship;

(b)  a corporation;

(c)  a partnership;

(d)  a limited liability company; or

(e)  an entity similar to one described in Subsections (1)(a) through (d).

(2)  "Waiver" means a workers' compensation coverage waiver issued under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2011 General Session

